Hawaii statutes.
§26-54 Administrative director of the
State. Effective July 1, 2004, the salary of the administrative
director of the State shall be as last recommended by the executive salary
commission. Effective July 1, 2007, and every six years thereafter, the salary
of the administrative director of the State shall be as last recommended by the
commission on salaries pursuant to section 26‑56, unless rejected by the
legislature. [L 1965, c 223, pt of §5; Supp, §4A-4; HRS §26-54; am L 1969, c
127, §3; am L 1975, c 58, §8; am L 1982, c 129, §1(4); am L 1986, c 128, §1(4);
am L 1989, c 329, §1(4); am L 2003, c 122, §5; am L 2006, c 299, §5]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next